Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 203B.29, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Mobile voting technology. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding subdivision 3, a voter casting a ballot in a jurisdiction that has authorized the use of mobile voting technology may request that ballots, instructions, and a certificate of voter eligibility be transmitted to the voter electronically through the mobile voting technology. The voter may return the ballot and certificate of voter eligibility electronically through the mobile voting technology. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.56, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Electronic voting system. "Electronic voting system" means a system in which the voter records votes by means of marking a ballot, so that votes may be counted by automatic tabulating equipment in the polling place where the ballot is cast or at a counting center. An electronic voting system includes automatic tabulating equipment; nonelectronic ballot markers; electronic ballot markers, including electronic ballot display, audio ballot reader, and devices by which the voter will register the voter's voting intent; software used to program automatic tabulators and layout ballots; new text begin mobile voting technology; new text end computer programs used to accumulate precinct results; ballots; secrecy folders; system documentation; and system testing results. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.56, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10a. new text end new text begin Mobile voting technology. new text end new text begin "Mobile voting technology" means the use of an application on a mobile device used to complete and submit a ballot in a secure and encrypted manner. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 206.58, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. May use experimental systems. The governing body of a municipality may provide for the experimental use of an electronic voting system in one or more precincts without formal adoption of the system. Use of the system at an election is as valid for all purposes as if the system had been permanently adopted. If the governing body of a municipality decides to use an electronic voting system, it shall, at a regular or special meeting held not less than 30 days before the election, prescribe suitable rules and instructions consistent with sections 206.55 to 206.90 for using the system and shall submit the rules and instructions to the secretary of state for approval. When approved, deleted text begin a printed copy ofdeleted text end the rules and instructions must be posted prominently in the polling place and must remain open to inspection by the voters throughout election daynew text begin or must be made conspicuously available to and acknowledged by a voter using mobile voting technology prior to votingnew text end . Sec. 5. new text begin [206.803] MOBILE VOTING TECHNOLOGY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Minimum requirements. new text end new text begin At a minimum, mobile voting technology must: new text end new text begin (1) be an approved electronic voting system pursuant to section 206.57 prior to use; new text end new text begin (2) utilize security features such as multifactor authentication for the mobile device application; new text end new text begin (3) utilize encryption when the ballot is transmitted; and new text end new text begin (4) be able to print the ballot in the same style and format as other ballots for the same precinct. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin The secretary of state may adopt rules to implement the use of mobile voting technology under this section. new text end